Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB128.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 205 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
The Department for Medicaid Services, any managed care organization with whom the
department contracts for the delivery of Medicaid services, and the state pharmacy
benefit manager contracted by the department pursuant to KRS 205.5512 shall not:
(1) Deny coverage of a nonopioid prescription drug in favor of an opioid prescription
drug when a licensed physician has prescribed a nonopioid medication for the
treatment of chronic or acute pain; or
(2) Establish more restrictive or more extensive utilization controls, including but not
limited to more restrictive or more extensive prior authorization or step therapy
requirements, for clinically appropriate nonopioid drugs than the least restrictive
or extensive utilization controls applicable to any clinically appropriate opioid or
narcotic drug.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/6/2025 11:07 AM Jacketed